src/filters/reorder-tags.otw.xfscript
!{ ind themes
define sdthm2    [%+Thm2   -> "@P.Theme.2@"    ];
define sdthm1sg  [%+Thm1Sg -> "@P.Theme.1Sg@"   ];
define sdthm1pl  [%+Thm1Pl -> "@P.Theme.1Pl@"   ];
define sdthmdir  [%+ThmDir -> "@P.Theme.Dir@"    ];
define sdthminv  [%+ThmInv -> "@P.Theme.Inv@"    ];
define sdthmpas  [%+ThmPas -> "@P.Theme.Pas@"    ];
!} ind theme seed end
!} theme seed end

!theme copy
!this is the last instance of ARGSLOT
!theme requirements being introduced only in this envi
!allows non-theme words (vai, vii, nouns) to surface
define cpthm    [%+ARGSLOT -> ["@R.Theme.2@"   %+Thm2 |
                            "@R.Theme.1Sg@" %+Thm1Sg | 
                            "@R.Theme.1Pl@" %+Thm1Pl | 
                            "@R.Theme.Dir@" %+ThmDir |
                            "@R.Theme.Inv@" %+ThmInv |
                            "@R.Theme.Pas@" %+ThmPas |
                            !cnj themes {
                            "@R.Theme.1@" %+Thm1    | 
                            "@R.Theme.2a@" %+Thm2a  | 
                            "@R.Theme.2b@" %+Thm2b  | 
                            "@R.Theme.Nul@" %+ThmNul    | 
                            "@R.Theme.1PlC@" %+Thm1PlC  | 
                            "@R.Theme.InvC@" %+ThmInvC  | 
                            [
                                "@R.Person@" "@R.Theme.DirC@" %+ThmNul| !simpler to use rules for ThmNul than to have really complicated ThmDirC
                                "@D.Person@" "@R.Theme.DirC@" %+ThmDirC   
                            ]
                            !}
                            ] || %+TWO "@D.Theme.Inan@" _ .#. ];

!} theme move end

!{ subject information (transitives)
!if zero insertions are a problem, we can always just move the environment into the target and duplicate in change
!this can be applied elsewhere
!{ independent order

!straight up specifying a sub-obj combo
define thm2vta       [ %+Thm2 -> %+2 %+Thm2 %+1 "^X$" ] ;

!copy
define cpthmdirpre    [[..] -> ["@R.Person.1@" %+1 | "@R.Person.2@" %+2 | "@R.Person.3@" %+3] || _ %+ThmDir ] ;

!fabricate
define 1Sgv2     [[..] -> %+1Sg || _ %+Thm1Sg ];
define 1Plv2     [[..] -> %+1Pl || _ %+Thm1Pl ]; !could also just directly specify both arguments in the way of Thm1PlC (see below) (though there's an independently needed rule that adds second person object ... elegance)
define 3vN       [[..] -> %+3 || _ %+ThmInv ];
define XPass     [[..] -> %+X || _ %+ThmPas ];

!inanimate subject adjustment
define Inaninv   [ %+3 -> ["@R.Inanimate.1@" %+%0|"@D.Inanimate.1@" %+3] || _ %+ThmInv ]; 
define rmInan    [ %+%0 -> 0 ||  _ "@P.Inanimate.1@"]; 
!} independent order end

!{ conjunct order

!straight up specifying a sub-obj combo
define thmdirc       [ %+ThmDirC -> %+3 %+ThmDirC %+4 "^X$" ] ; !recall, other person combinations with surface thmdir have been remapped to thmnul
define thm2b       [ %+Thm2b -> %+3 %+Thm2b %+2Sg  "^X$"] ; 
define thm1plc      [ %+Thm1PlC -> %+1Pl %+Thm1PlC %+2  "^X$"] ; 

define thmInvNegSpec [ %+ThmInvC -> [
                                    ["@R.Periph.3Sg@" "@R.Number.2Pl@" "@N.Theme.InvC@" %+ThmInvC ]|
                                    [[
                                    "@R.Periph.3Sg@" "@D.Number.2Pl@"|
                                    "@D.Periph.3Sg@" "@R.Number.2Pl@"|
                                    "@D.Periph.3Sg@" "@D.Number.2Pl@"
                                    ]
                                    %+ThmInvC]] ] ; !Turn off ThemeInvC to stop normal handling of 3sg&2Pl, else leave it on (InanvN, cpInvObjcnj require ThmInvC)
!fabricate
define InanvN       [[..] -> [ ["@R.Theme.InvC@"
                                [
                                %+%0|
                                !"@R.Periph@" %+4 !simpler, regular version.
                                !less regular version for coping with suprising irregularity (see earlier comment about possible typo in valentine 2001)
                                "@R.Periph@" "@D.Person@" %+4|
                                "@R.Periph.3Sg@" "@R.Person@" %+3Sg|
                                "@R.Periph.3Pl@" "@R.Person@" %+3Pl
                                ]
                            ]|"@D.Theme.InvC@" %+3Sg ] 
                            || _ %+ThmInvC ];

!copy
define cpSubthm1 [[..] -> [
                            "@R.Number.1Pl@" "@D.Periph@" [%+2Pl|%+2Sg]| !1pl marked forms ambig btw 2sg/pl only if there has been no specification of 3
                            "@R.Person.2@" %+2 |
                            "@R.Periph@" %+3
                            ] 
                            || _ %+Thm1 ] ;
define cpSubthm2a   [[..] ->    [
                                "@D.Periph@" %+1Sg|
                                "@R.Periph.3Sg@" %+3Sg| !spell out to avoid 2Pl objects triggering 3->3Pl
                                "@R.Periph.3Pl@" %+3Pl
                                ] 
                                || _ %+Thm2a] ;
define cpSubthmNul  [[..] -> [ 
                                "@R.Person.1@" %+1|
                                "@R.Person.2@" %+2
                                ] || _ %+ThmNul] ;
!} conjunct order end
!} subject info end

!{ obj
!{ object copying
    !these names aren't great
define cp3Objvta [[..] -> [["@R.Person.3@" %+3  |  
                            "@R.Person.1@" %+1  |
                            "@R.Person.2@" %+2  ] "^X$"]
                            || %+ThmInv _ ];

define cp1Objvta [[..] -> [[ "@D.Person@"  %+3  |
                            "@R.Person.1@" %+1  |
                            "@R.Person.2@" %+2  ] "^X$"]
                            || %+ThmPas  _ ];

define cp2Objvta [[..] -> [
                            "@R.Person.2@" %+2 "^X$" ]
                            || [%+Thm1Sg|%+Thm1Pl]  _ ]; !in independent order, thesetheme signs do indeed require a second person prefix.
                            !cnj Thm1Pl does not require a second person prefix (second person marking is required, but treated here as a number flag)
                            !I decided to keep the independent order as strict as possible (enforcing the prefix requirement), so now we have a cnj series and an ind series ... this is open to revision :D

!} obj copy end

!{ object fabrication
define Nv3       [[..] -> %+3 "^X$" || %+ThmDir _ ];

!{ cnj spec
define Nv1      [[..] -> %+1 "^X$" || %+Thm1 _ ] ;
define Nv2      [[..] -> %+2 "^X$" || %+Thm2a _ ] ;
define Nv3cnj   [[..] -> [["@R.Periph.3Pl@" %+3Pl|"@R.Periph.3Sg@" %+3Sg] "^X$"] || %+ThmNul _ ] ; !can't let later number fusion take over, because +3 -> +3Pl with +2Pl

!neg 0v2pl and neg 3sv2pl are homophonous (igosiweg...), so +3 is emitted, which gives an undesired 0v3sg reading to igosiweg
!need to have a special write out of @thminvc, @2pl, @periph.3sg, and block 3sg object spellout in this context
!   @thminv @2pl        -> 0 2PlO   (igosiweg)
!   @thminv @3sg @2pl   -> 3 2PlO   (igosiweg)
!   @thminv @3sg @2pl   // 0 3O     (igosiweg)
define cpInvObjcnj [[..] -> [
                            [
                                ["@R.Theme.InvC@"
                                    [
                                    "@R.Periph.3Sg@" %+3Sg| !more elegant R.Periph was allowing negated 0v2Pl to also be parsed as 0v3Pl
                                    "@R.Periph.3Pl@" %+3Pl|
                                    "@R.Person.1@" %+1 |
                                    "@R.Person.2@" %+2
                                    ]
                                ]|
                                ["@D.Theme.InvC@" %+2]
                            ]"^X$" ]
                || %+ThmInvC _ ] ;
!} cnj spec end
!} obj fab end
!} obj end

!number fusion {
    !now the arguments are in the desired spot (flanking a theme sign at the end of a word)
    !they are just (mostly) bereft of number information
    !we remedy this problem here

!just vtas
define fs1plvtaloc  [ %+1 -> ["@R.Number.1Pl@" %+1Pl | "@D.Number.1Pl@" %+1Sg] 
                        || [%+Thm2|%+Thm1] _ ]; !Thm1 added, as cnj works the same
define 2plopt       [ %+2 -> [%+2Pl|%+2Sg] || _ %+Thm2 ? %+1Pl ]; !second person number is ambiguous in this context.
define 2ploptcnj    [ [..] -> ["@D.Periph@"[%+2Pl|%+2Sg]|"@R.Periph@" %+3] || _ %+Thm1 ? %+1Pl ]; !cnj version (might be good to make independent order Thm2 be Thm1)
define fs2plvtaloc  [ %+2 -> ["@R.Number.2Pl@" %+2Pl | "@D.Number.2Pl@" %+2Sg ] || _ %+Thm2 ] ;
define fs3plv3vta   [ %+3 -> ["@R.Number.2Pl@"    %+3Pl  | "@D.Number.2Pl@" %+3Sg  ] || _ %+ThmDir %+3, [%+%0|%+3] %+ThmInv ? _ ]; 
!third person disambiguation
!Inan v obv?
define fs3obvv3vta  [ %+3 -> %+4 || [%+3Sg|%+3Pl] %+ThmDir _, _ %+ThmInv ? ? [%+3Sg|%+3Pl] ];
define fs3plvta     [ %+3 -> ["@R.Periph.3Pl@" %+3Pl  | "@D.Periph.3Pl@" %+3Sg] ||  %+ThmDir _, _ %+ThmInv  ] ; !carving out exception to  elegant general purpose 3pl fusion, introducing invisible separator between thmdir and arg.

!applicable to all parts of speech 
define fs21pl    [ %+2 -> ["@R.Number.1Pl@"    %+21Pl | "@D.Number.1Pl@" %+2 ]   ]; 
define fs2pl     [ %+2 -> ["@R.Number.2Pl@"    %+2Pl  | "@D.Number.2Pl@" %+2Sg ]  ];
define fs3pla    [ %+3 -> ["@R.Number.2Pl@"    %+3Pl  | "@D.Number.2Pl@" %+3 ]  ]; !vta 3v3, noun, vti 3Pl signalled by 2pl marker with 3 prefix
define fs3pl     [ %+3 -> ["@R.Periph.3Pl@"    %+3Pl  | "@D.Periph.3Pl@" %+3Sg ]  ]; !vai, most vta 3Pl signalled by 3pl marker. (currently vta 2pl v 3sg -> 2pl v 3pl)
define fs1pl     [ %+1 -> ["@R.Number.1Pl@"    %+1Pl  | "@D.Number.1Pl@" %+1Sg ]  ];
define fsinanpl  [ %+%0 -> ["@R.Periph.InanPl@" %+%0Pl | "@D.Periph.InanPl@" %+%0Sg] ]; !vta conjunct order doesn't distinguish plurality in inan, perhaps keep +0 in vta cnj


!}

!} vta end

!{ cleaning
!theme sign simplification
define chThm [ [
                %+Thm2|
                %+Thm1Sg|
                %+Thm1Pl|
                %+ThmDir|
                %+ThmInv|
                %+ThmPas|
                !cnj
                %+Thm1PlC|
                %+ThmDirC|
                %+ThmInvC|
                %+Thm2a|
                %+Thm2b|
                %+Thm1|
                %+ThmNul|
                !vtis
                %+ThmInan
                ] -> %+Thm ];

define ch4Sg [ %+4 %+Sg -> %+4Sg ] ; !VIIs

!object coding
define chO [%+1Sg -> %+1SgO, 
            %+2Sg -> %+2SgO,
            %+3Sg -> %+3SgO,
            %+1Pl -> %+1PlO,
            %+21Pl -> %+21PlO,
            %+2Pl -> %+2PlO,
            %+3Pl -> %+3PlO,
            %+4 -> %+4O ,
            %+%0Sg -> %+%0SgO,
            %+%0Pl -> %+%0PlO
            || _ "^X$" ]; 

!possessor coding
define chP [
            %+1Sg ->  ["@R.Animate@" %+Px1Sg |"@D.Animate@" %+1Sg ], 
            %+2Sg ->  ["@R.Animate@" %+Px2Sg |"@D.Animate@" %+2Sg ],
            %+3Sg ->  ["@R.Animate@" %+Px3Sg |"@D.Animate@" %+3Sg ],
            %+1Pl ->  ["@R.Animate@" %+Px1Pl |"@D.Animate@" %+1Pl ],
            %+21Pl -> ["@R.Animate@" %+Px21Pl|"@D.Animate@" %+21Pl],
            %+2Pl ->  ["@R.Animate@" %+Px2Pl |"@D.Animate@" %+2Pl ],
            %+3Pl ->  ["@R.Animate@" %+Px3Pl |"@D.Animate@" %+3Pl ],
            %+X   ->  ["@R.Animate@" %+PxX   |"@D.Animate@" %+X   ],
            %+4 ->    ["@R.Animate@" %+Px4   |"@D.Animate@" %+4   ]
            !%+%0Sg -> ["@R.Animate@" %+Px%0Sg|"@D.Animate@" %+%0Sg], !not applicable to nouns
            !%+%0Pl -> ["@R.Animate@" %+Px%0Pl|"@D.Animate@" %+%0Pl]
            || _ .#. ];
